Utah statutes.
41-3-410.   State civil enforcement.
(1)  If a person violates Sections 41-3-406 through 41-3-409, the attorney
general may bring an action to:
(a)  temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the violation;
(b)  recover any amounts for the benefit of injured consumers for which the
violator is liable under Section 41-3-411;
(c)  recover a civil penalty of up to $10,000 for each violation that is
committed; and
(d)  obtain any other equitable relief the court determines to be proper, in
addition to damages and civil penalties.
(2)  An action under Subsection (1) must be brought within two years from the
date on which the violation is discovered and disclosed to the attorney
general.
